Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 1 General Provisions

27-4-30.
Fishing in private ponds.

The owner of a private pond, the owner’s immediate family, or tenants with the owner’s consent shall be permitted to fish within the bounds of the pond at any time and in any manner without a fishing license. All other persons shall be required to obtain fishing licenses to fish within the bounds of a private pond as provided in this title unless the fish in the private pond are “domestic fish” as defined in paragraph (23) of Code Section 27-1-2. For the purposes of this Code section, the term “private pond” shall not include ponds owned by city or county governments, the State of Georgia, the United States, or authorities or political subdivisions of such governments.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 169, § 5; Code 1933, § 45-505; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 82; Code 1933, § 45-703, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 600, § 3; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 14/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “immediate” near the beginning of the first sentence. See Editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-4-31.
Catch-out pond licenses.

The owner or operator of a catch-out pond operated as one contiguous unit and under single ownership, including ownership by a partnership, firm, association, or corporation, may purchase a catch-out pond license as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. Such license shall not be transferable to another owner or operator or to any other site. Persons, both residents and nonresidents, may fish in a properly licensed catch-out pond without obtaining a fishing license or trout license and without complying with the creel limits, possession limits, size limits, and seasons set forth in this title. It shall be unlawful for the owner or operator of a catch-out pond not properly licensed to represent to any person that such person may fish in the pond as if the pond were a licensed catch-out pond.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 274, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-307, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 28; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 14.

27-4-32.
Sport trotlines.

Sport trotlines must be marked with the owner’s name and address and with visible buoys and must be submerged at least three feet below the surface of the water. Such trotlines must be attended regularly and removed after the completed fishing trip. Unmarked or unattended lines will be confiscated by personnel of the department. As used in this Code section, “sport trotlines” means one line or a combination of lines using less than 51 hooks. It shall be unlawful to use any sport trotline within one-half mile below any lock or dam on any of the fresh waters of this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-706, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 306, § 1.

27-4-33.
Spearing of fish.

It shall be unlawful to spear game fish and all species of catfish in the fresh waters of this state except as provided in this Code section; provided, however, other species of nongame fish may be speared solely for the purpose of sport, provided the person engaged in the act of spearing is completely submerged.

“Spearing” as used in this Code section shall be limited to the use of a spear or similar instrument that is held in the hand of the person using the same and the use of a weapon other than a firearm which propels or forces a projectile or similar device therefrom, to which a wire, rope, line, cord, or other means of recovering the projectile or similar device is attached, which wire, rope, line, cord, or other means is secured to the weapon or the person using the weapon.

It shall also be unlawful for any person to engage in the spearing of fish in the fresh waters of this state without a resident or nonresident fishing license as provided in Code Section 27-2-23.

It shall be unlawful to use spears with poisonous or exploding heads.

It shall be unlawful to discharge spears into waters nearer than 150 feet to anyone engaged in any other means of recreation.

Any game fish, except channel catfish and flathead catfish taken under the provisions of subsection (g) of this Code section, with an open wound and in the possession of a person fishing with a spear shall be prima-facie evidence of taking and possessing fish illegally.

It shall be unlawful to take channel catfish and flathead catfish anywhere in the Savannah River, including its tributaries and impoundments within the Savannah River Basin, by means of spearing, except under the following conditions:

The taking of channel catfish and flathead catfish in the Savannah River, including its tributaries and impoundments within the Savannah River Basin, by spear shall be legal at any time of the day and at night by the use of a light; and

All spears used pursuant to this subsection must be equipped with barbs or contain devices on the point to act as a harpoon for recovering fish and must be attached to the person using the spear or to the weapon by a rope, line, or cord sufficient for recovering the spear and channel catfish or flathead catfish.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 181, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 23; Code 1933, § 45-707, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 420, § 9; Ga. L. 1984, p. 537, § 5; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1487, § 2/HB 301.

27-4-34.
Fishing with bow and arrow.

It shall be unlawful to take nongame fish from the waters of this state by means of bow and arrow except under the following conditions:

Each person using a bow and arrow shall have on his or her person a valid state resident or nonresident fishing license;

All arrows used pursuant to this Code section must be equipped with barbs or contain devices on the point to act as a harpoon for recovering fish and must be attached to the person or bow by a rope, line, or cord sufficient for recovering the arrow and nongame fish;

Arrows with poisonous or exploding heads are illegal;

It shall be unlawful to discharge arrows into waters nearer than 150 feet to anyone engaged in any other means of recreation; and

Legal hours for the taking of fish by bow and arrow shall be from sunrise to sunset, except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) in this Code section.

Any game fish, except channel catfish and flathead catfish taken under the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section, with an open wound and in the possession of a person fishing with a bow and arrow shall be prima-facie evidence of taking and possessing fish illegally.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section, if all other requirements of said subsection (a) are met, nongame fish may be taken in impounded waters of reservoirs over 500 acres in size by bow and arrow at any time during the day and may be taken at night by the use of a light.

It shall be unlawful to take channel catfish and flathead catfish anywhere in the Savannah River, including its tributaries and impoundments within the Savannah River Basin, by means of bow and arrow, except under the following conditions:

Each person using a bow and arrow shall have on his or her person a valid state resident or nonresident fishing license;

All arrows used pursuant to this subsection must be equipped with barbs or contain devices on the point to act as a harpoon for recovering fish and must be attached to the person or bow by a rope, line, or cord sufficient for recovering the arrow and channel catfish or flathead catfish;

Arrows with poisonous or exploding heads are illegal;

It shall be unlawful to discharge arrows into waters nearer than 150 feet to anyone engaged in any other means of recreation; and

The taking of channel catfish and flathead catfish in the Savannah River, including its tributaries and impoundments within the Savannah River Basin, by bow and arrow shall be legal at any time of the day and at night by the use of a light.

Subject to the provisions of this Code section, and in accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management, the board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations regarding the taking of any fish from the salt waters of this state by means of bow and arrow.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-709, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 366, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1636, § 6; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1393, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 7/HB 869.

27-4-35.
[Reserved] Sport shad fishing.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 8/HB 869, effective January 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 8/HB 869 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective January 1, 2013.

27-4-36.
Artificial-lure streams or lakes.

It shall be unlawful to fish in any artificial-lure stream or lake except with an artificial lure or to have any bait or lure other than artificial in possession at such stream or lake. The board shall have the authority to designate streams, lakes, or parts of streams or lakes as artificial-lure streams or lakes and to promulgate rules regarding fishing methods, gear, and size or type of artificial lures that may be used on such streams or lakes.

It shall be unlawful to have in possession while fishing such streams or lakes any bait, lure, landing net, or other gear which may not be lawfully used on such streams or lakes.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-719, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 2004, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, §§ 14, 15; Ga. L. 1995, p. 543, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 980, § 7.

27-4-37.
Taking of fish by grabbling, noodling, or hand grabbing.

It shall be unlawful to fish for game fish, catfish, and all other species of fish in the freshwaters of the state by grabbling, noodling, or hand grabbing except as provided in this Code section. Flathead, channel, and blue catfish may be taken by hand without the aid of any device, hook, snare, net, or other artificial instrument and without the aid of any scuba equipment, air hose, or other artificial breathing apparatus between March 1 and July 15 of each year.

It shall be unlawful to alter any natural or manmade feature by placing boards, wire, barrels, buckets, or any device or obstruction in any stream or other body of water or to modify any log, hole, or other feature in an attempt to attract or capture fish by grabbling, noodling, or hand grabbing or to take fish by grabbling, noodling, or hand grabbing from such altered devices. It shall also be unlawful to raise any part of a natural or artificial device out of the water to aid in the hand capture of enclosed fish.

Any game fish, except channel and flathead catfish, taken in violation of the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section that are in the possession of a person grabbling, noodling, or hand grabbing fish shall be prima-facie evidence of taking and possessing fish illegally.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the grabbling, noodling, or hand grabbing of flathead, channel, or blue catfish in the fresh waters of this state without a resident or nonresident fishing license as provided in Code Section 27-2-23.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-37

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1487, § 3/HB 301; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 27/SB 465.